Tennessee, session 114, HB1993.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-2357(b), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(b) A health insurance issuer or a managed health insurance issuer shall not:
(1) Deny a licensed medical laboratory the right to participate as a
participating provider in a policy, contract, or plan on the same terms and
conditions as are offered to another medical laboratory under the policy, contract,
or plan; provided, that this subdivision (b)(1) does not prohibit a managed health
insurance issuer or health insurance issuer from establishing rates or fees that
may be higher in nonurban areas, or in specific instances where a managed
health insurance issuer or health insurance issuer determines it necessary to
contract with a particular provider in order to meet network adequacy standards
or patient care needs;
(2) Prevent a person who is a party to or beneficiary of a policy, contract,
or plan from selecting a licensed medical laboratory of the person's choice to
furnish the medical laboratory services offered under the contract, policy, or plan;
provided, that the medical laboratory is a participating provider under the same
terms and conditions of the contract, policy, or plan as those offered to another
medical laboratory; or
HB1993
009797
- 1 -

(3) Except as provided in subsection (e), reimburse a non-network
medical laboratory that is eligible to participate as a participating provider under
this section for testing services at a rate that is less than the federal centers for
medicare and medicaid services' clinical laboratory fee schedule for medical
laboratories in this state.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-2357, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
(e) A managed health insurance issuer may require that, in order to receive the
rate of reimbursement specified under subdivision (b)(3), a non-network medical
laboratory meet the same performance metrics required of in-network medical
laboratories.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 009797